Texas, session 892, HB235.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Effective January 1, 2026, Subchapter H, Chapter 151, Tax Code, is amended by adding Section 151.3272 to read as follows: Sec. 151.3272.  TAXABLE ITEMS PURCHASED BY TOTALLY DISABLED VETERAN.  (a)  In this section: (1)  "Disability rating" and "disabled veteran" have the meanings assigned by Section 11.22. (2)  "Qualified disabled veteran" means a disabled veteran with a disability rating of 100 percent. (b)  The sale or storage, use, or other consumption of a taxable item purchased by a qualified disabled veteran or a person authorized to make purchases on behalf of a qualified disabled veteran is exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter if the qualified disabled veteran or authorized person completes, signs, and presents at the time of purchase the exemption certificate form described by Subsection (c). (c)  The comptroller shall develop an exemption certificate form that a qualified disabled veteran or authorized person must complete and use to claim the exemption provided by Subsection (b). The comptroller shall make the form available on the comptroller's Internet website. (d)  The exemption provided by Subsection (b) applies only to the first $25,000 of taxable items purchased in a calendar year by a qualified disabled veteran or authorized person. SECTION 2.  As soon as practicable after the effective date of this Act, but not later than December 31, 2025, the comptroller of public accounts shall post on the comptroller's Internet website the exemption certificate form as required by Section 151.3272, Tax Code, as added by this Act. SECTION 3.  The change in law made by this Act does not affect tax liability accruing before the effective date of this Act.  That liability continues in effect as if this Act had not been enacted, and the former law is continued in effect for the collection of taxes due and for civil and criminal enforcement of the liability for those taxes. SECTION 4.  Except as otherwise provided by this Act, this Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.